Hawaii statutes.
[§634-26] Form of published notice.
The published notice provided for by section 634-23 shall be in the form of a
summons, without a caption but referring to the complaint or petition, stating
briefly the object of the action or proceeding[,] with a brief description of
the property involved, and calling upon the persons to whom it is addressed to
plead on or before a return day stated in the notice. [L 1917, c 67, §3; RL
1925, §2347; am L 1929, c 43, §4; RL 1935, §4083; RL 1945, §10065; RL 1955,
§230-36; HRS §634-63; am L 1972, c 89, §2A(i); ren HRS §634-26]

Rules of Court

Publication of summons, see HRCP rule 4.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next